Indiana, session 2026, SB166.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 1-1-4-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The following definitions apply to the
construction of all Indiana statutes, unless the construction is plainly
repugnant to the intent of the general assembly or of the context of the
statute:
(1) "Adult", "of full age", and "person in his majority" mean a
person at least eighteen (18) years of age.
(2) "Attorney" includes a counselor or other person authorized to
appear and represent a party in an action or special proceeding.
(3) "Autism" means a neurological condition as described in the
most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of
Mental Disorders of the American Psychiatric Association.
(4) "Bond" does not necessarily imply a seal.
(5) "Clerk" means the clerk of the court or a person authorized to
perform the clerk's duties.
(6) "Health record", "hospital record", or "medical record" means
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


written or printed information possessed by a provider (as defined
in IC 16-18-2-295) concerning any diagnosis, treatment, or
prognosis of the patient, unless otherwise defined. Except as
otherwise provided, the terms include mental health records and
drug and alcohol abuse records.
(7) "Highway" includes county bridges and state and county
roads, unless otherwise expressly provided.
(8) "Infant" or "minor" means a person less than eighteen (18)
years of age.
(9) "Inhabitant" may be construed to mean a resident in any place.
(10) "Judgment" means all final orders, decrees, and
determinations in an action and all orders upon which executions
may issue.
(11) "Land", "real estate", and "real property" include lands,
tenements, and hereditaments.
(12) "Mentally incompetent" means of unsound mind.
(13) "Money demands on contract", when used in reference to an
action, means an action arising out of contract when the relief
demanded is a recovery of money.
(14) "Month" means a calendar month, unless otherwise
expressed.
(15) "Noncode statute" means a statute that is not codified as part
of the Indiana Code.
(16) "Oath" includes "affirmation", and "to swear" includes to
"affirm".
(17) "Person" extends to bodies politic and corporate.
(18) "Personal property" includes goods, chattels, evidences of
debt, and things in action.
(19) "Population" has the meaning set forth in IC 1-1-3.5-3.
(20) "Preceding" and "following", referring to sections in statutes,
mean the sections next preceding or next following that in which
the words occur, unless some other section is designated.
(21) "Property" includes personal and real property.
(22) "Sheriff" means the sheriff of the county or another person
authorized to perform sheriff's duties.
(23) "State", applied to any one (1) of the United States, includes
the District of Columbia and the commonwealths, possessions,
states in free association with the United States, and the
territories. "United States" includes the District of Columbia and
the commonwealths, possessions, states in free association with
the United States, and the territories.
(24) "Under legal disabilities" includes persons less than eighteen
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


(18) years of age, mentally incompetent, or out of the United
States.
(25) "Verified", when applied to pleadings, means supported by
oath or affirmation in writing.
(26) "Will" includes a testament and codicil.
(27) "Without relief" in any judgment, contract, execution, or
other instrument of writing or record, means without the benefit
of valuation laws.
(28) "Written" and "in writing" include printing, lithographing, or
other mode of representing words and letters. If the written
signature of a person is required, the terms mean the proper
handwriting of the person or the person's mark.
(29) "Year" means a calendar year, unless otherwise expressed.
(30) The definitions in IC 35-31.5 apply to all statutes relating to
penal offenses.
(b) This subsection applies to the definitions of "Hoosier veteran"
and "veteran" when used in reference to state programs for veterans.
The term "veteran" includes "Hoosier veteran", and applies to the
construction of all Indiana statutes, unless the construction is expressly
excluded by the terms of the statute, is plainly repugnant to the intent
of the general assembly or of the context of the statute, or is
inconsistent with federal law. "Hoosier veteran" means an individual
who meets the following criteria:
(1) The individual is a resident of Indiana.
(2) The individual served in an active or reserve component of the
armed forces of the United States or the Indiana National Guard.
(3) The individual completed any required military occupational
specialty training and was not discharged or separated from the
armed forces or the Indiana National Guard under conditions
other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). honorable
conditions.
The definitions set forth in this subsection may not be construed to
affect a Hoosier veteran's eligibility for any state program that is based
upon a particular aspect of the Hoosier veteran's service such as a
disability or a wartime service requirement.
SECTION 2. IC 4-13-16.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.
(b) "Commission" refers to the governor's commission on supplier
diversity established under section 2 of this chapter.
(c) "Commissioner" refers to the commissioner of the department.
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


(d) "Contract" means any contract awarded by a state agency or, as
set forth in section 2(g)(11) of this chapter, awarded by a recipient of
state grant funds, for construction projects or the procurement of goods
or services, including professional services. For purposes of this
subsection, "goods or services" may not include the following when
determining the total value of contracts for state agencies:
(1) Utilities.
(2) Health care services (as defined in IC 27-8-11-1(c)).
(3) Rent paid for real property or payments constituting the price
of an interest in real property as a result of a real estate
transaction.
(e) "Contractor" means a person or entity that:
(1) contracts with a state agency; or
(2) as set forth in section 2(g)(11) of this chapter:
(A) is a recipient of state grant funds; and
(B) enters into a contract:
(i) with a person or entity other than a state agency; and
(ii) that is paid for in whole or in part with the state grant
funds.
(f) "Department" refers to the Indiana department of administration
established by IC 4-13-1-2.
(g) "Deputy commissioner" refers to the deputy commissioner for
supplier diversity of the department.
(h) "Minority business enterprise" or "minority business" means an
individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or joint
venture of any kind that is owned and controlled by one (1) or more
persons who are:
(1) United States citizens; and
(2) members of a minority group or a qualified minority nonprofit
corporation.
(i) "NGB-22" means the National Guard Report of Separation form
or its predecessor or successor form.
(j) "Qualified minority or women's nonprofit corporation" means a
corporation that:
(1) is exempt from federal income taxation under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(2) is headquartered in Indiana;
(3) has been in continuous existence for at least five (5) years;
(4) has a board of directors that has been in compliance with all
other requirements of this chapter for at least five (5) years;
(5) is chartered for the benefit of the minority community or
women; and
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


(6) provides a service that will not impede competition among
minority business enterprises or women's business enterprises at
the time a nonprofit applies for certification as a minority
business enterprise or a women's business enterprise.
(k) "Owned and controlled" means:
(1) if the business is a qualified minority nonprofit corporation, a
majority of the board of directors are minority;
(2) if the business is a qualified women's nonprofit corporation,
a majority of the members of the board of directors are women; or
(3) if the business is a business other than a qualified minority or
women's nonprofit corporation, having:
(A) ownership of at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the
enterprise, including corporate stock of a corporation;
(B) control over the management and active in the day-to-day
operations of the business; and
(C) an interest in the capital, assets, and profits and losses of
the business proportionate to the percentage of ownership.
(l) "Minority group" means:
(1) African Americans;
(2) Native Americans;
(3) Hispanic Americans; and
(4) Asian Americans.
(m) "Separate body corporate and politic" refers to an entity
established by the general assembly as a body corporate and politic.
(n) "State agency" refers to any authority, board, branch,
commission, committee, department, division, or other instrumentality
of the executive, including the administrative, department of state
government.
(o) "Veteran" means an individual who:
(1) has previously:
(A) served on active duty in any branch of the armed forces of
the United States or their reserves, in the national guard, or in
the Indiana National Guard; and
(B) received a discharge from service under conditions other
than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2); honorable
conditions; or
(2) is currently serving in:
(A) any branch of the armed forces of the United States or
their reserves;
(B) the national guard; or
(C) the Indiana National Guard.
(p) "Veteran owned small business" refers to a small business that:
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


(1) is independently owned and operated;
(2) is not dominant in its field of operation; and
(3) satisfies the criteria to be a veteran owned small business
concern as specified in section 1.5 of this chapter.
(q) "Women's business enterprise" means a business that is one (1)
of the following:
(1) A sole proprietorship owned and controlled by a woman.
(2) A partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by
women in which:
(A) at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the ownership is held by
women; and
(B) the management and daily business operations are
controlled by at least one (1) of the women who owns the
business.
(3) A corporation or other entity:
(A) whose management and daily business operations are
controlled by at least one (1) of the women who owns the
business; and
(B) that is at least fifty-one percent (51%) owned by women,
or if stock is issued, at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the
stock is owned by at least one (1) of the women.
(4) A qualified women's nonprofit corporation.
SECTION 3. IC 4-15-2.2-32, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 32. (a) Former members of the armed forces of the
United States who meet both of the following requirements shall
receive a preference for appointment or reemployment in the state
classified service:
(1) The veteran served on active duty in any branch of the armed
forces.
(2) The veteran was not discharged or separated from the armed
forces under conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
honorable conditions.
(b) When:
(1) preemployment interviews of external candidates are
conducted; and
(2) the qualified applicant pool includes veterans;
veterans must be included in the group offered interviews.
(c) In computing seniority for purposes of a personnel reduction in
state civil service, the computation must include the length of time the
employee spent on active duty in the armed forces of the United States.
SECTION 4. IC 5-9-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. Persons discharged from the armed forces of
the United States under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2), honorable conditions, by reason of disability
resulting from wounds or sickness incurred in the line of duty, shall be
preferred for appointment to civil offices, provided they are found to
possess the capacity necessary for the proper discharge of such offices.
SECTION 5. IC 5-9-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Political subdivisions of the state of Indiana
shall allow preference points to eligible armed forces veterans who are
being examined for full time employment. Preference points awarded
to such veterans on each such examination shall be ten percent (10%)
of the total number of points which may be obtained thereon.
(b) To be eligible to receive preference points, under this chapter,
a person must have:
(1) served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States
for at least one hundred eighty-one (181) days; and
(2) received a discharge from service under conditions other than
conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). honorable conditions.
(c) The provisions of this chapter are in lieu of any policy of a
political subdivision allowing employment preference for veterans in
effect before July 1, 1975.
SECTION 6. IC 5-10.3-7-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A member who:
(1) enters the United States armed services;
(2) leaves the member's contributions in the fund;
(3) except as provided in subsection (c), resumes service with the
member's employer within one hundred twenty (120) days after
the member's unconditional discharge; and
(4) would be entitled to service credit for military service under
the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights
Act (38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq.) if the member had resumed service
with the member's employer within ninety (90) days after
discharge;
is entitled to service credit for the armed service.
(b) A state employee who left employment before January 1, 1946,
or an employee of a political subdivision who left employment before
the participation date, to enter the United States armed services is
entitled to service credit for the armed service if the member:
(1) except as provided in subsection (c), resumes service with the
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


employer within one hundred twenty (120) days after the
member's unconditional discharge; and
(2) would be entitled to service credit for military service under
the applicable requirements of federal law in effect at the time of
reemployment if the employee had resumed service with the
employee's employer within ninety (90) days after discharge.
(c) The board shall extend the one hundred twenty (120) day
reemployment requirement contained in subsection (a)(3) or (b)(1) if
the board determines that an illness, an injury, or a disability related to
the member's military service prevented the member from resuming
employment within one hundred twenty (120) days after the member's
discharge from military service. However, the board may not extend the
deadline beyond thirty (30) months after the member's discharge.
(d) If a member retires and the board subsequently determines that
the member is entitled to additional service credit due to the extension
of a deadline under subsection (c), the board shall recompute the
member's benefit. However, the additional service credit may be used
only in the computation of benefits to be paid after the date of the
board's determination, and the member is not entitled to a
recomputation of benefits received before the date of the board's
determination.
(e) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a member is
entitled to service credit and benefits in the amount and to the extent
required by the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment
Rights Act (38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq.).
(f) Subject to the provisions of this section, an active member may
purchase and claim not more than two (2) years of service credit for the
member's service on active duty in the armed services if the member
meets the following conditions:
(1) The member has at least one (1) year of credited service in the
fund.
(2) The member serves on active duty in the armed services of the
United States for at least six (6) months.
(3) The member receives a discharge from the armed services
under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). honorable conditions.
(4) Before the member retires, the member makes contributions
to the fund as follows:
(A) Contributions that are equal to the product of the
following:
(i) The member's salary at the time the member actually
makes a contribution for the service credit.
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


(ii) A rate, determined by the actuary of the fund, that is
based on the age of the member at the time the member
actually makes a contribution for service credit and
computed to result in a contribution amount that
approximates the actuarial present value of the benefit
attributable to the service credit purchased.
(iii) The number of years of service credit the member
intends to purchase.
(B) Contributions for any accrued interest, at a rate determined
by the actuary of the fund, for the period from the member's
initial membership in the fund to the date payment is made by
the member.
However, a member is entitled to purchase service credit under this
subsection only to the extent that service credit is not granted for that
time under another provision of this section. At least ten (10) years of
service in Indiana is required before a member may receive a benefit
based on service credits purchased under this section. A member who
terminates employment before satisfying the eligibility requirements
necessary to receive a monthly allowance or receives a monthly
allowance for the same service from another tax supported public
employee retirement plan other than under the federal Social Security
Act may withdraw the purchase amount plus accumulated interest after
submitting a properly completed application for a refund to the fund.
(g) The following apply to the purchase of service credit under
subsection (f):
(1) The board may allow a member to make periodic payments of
the contributions required for the purchase of the service credit.
The board shall determine the length of the period during which
the payments must be made.
(2) The board may deny an application for the purchase of service
credit if the purchase would exceed the limitations under Section
415 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) A member may not claim the service credit for purposes of
determining eligibility or computing benefits unless the member
has made all payments required for the purchase of the service
credit.
SECTION 7. IC 5-10.4-4-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) This subsection applies to a member who
retires before July 1, 1980. A member who had completed four (4)
years of approved college teacher education before voluntary or
involuntary induction into the military services is entitled to credit for
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


that service as if the member had begun teaching before the induction.
A member who serves in military service is considered a teacher and
is entitled to the benefits of the fund if before or during the leave of
absence the member pays into the fund the member's contributions.
Time served by a member in military service for the duration of the
hostilities or for the length of active service in the hostilities and the
necessary demobilization time after the hostilities is not subject to the
one-seventh rule set forth in section 7 of this chapter.
(b) This subsection applies to a member who retires after June 30,
1980. A member who completed four (4) years of approved college
teacher education before voluntary or involuntary induction into
military service is entitled to credit for the member's active military
service as if the member had begun teaching before the induction. A
member who serves in military service is considered a teacher and is
entitled to the benefits of the fund if the following conditions are met:
(1) The member has received a discharge from military service
under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). honorable conditions.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (g), the member returns to
active teaching service not later than twenty-four (24) months
after the completion of active military service.
(3) The member has at least ten (10) years of in-state service
credit.
The time served by a member in military service for the duration of the
hostilities or for the length of active service in the hostilities and the
necessary demobilization time after the hostilities is not subject to the
one-seventh rule set forth in section 7 of this chapter. However, not
more than six (6) years of military service credit may be granted under
this subsection.
(c) This subsection applies to a member who retires after May 1,
1989. A member who had begun but had not completed four (4) years
of approved college teacher education before voluntary or involuntary
induction into the military services is entitled to service credit in an
amount equal to the duration of the member's active military service if
the following conditions are met:
(1) The member has received a discharge from military service
under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). honorable conditions.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (g), the member returns to a
four (4) year approved college teacher training program not later
than twenty-four (24) months after the completion of active
military service and subsequently completes that program.
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


(3) The member has at least ten (10) years of in-state service
credit.
The time served by a member in active military service for the length
of active service in the hostilities and the necessary demobilization is
not subject to the one-seventh rule set forth in section 7 of this chapter.
However, not more than six (6) years of military service credit may be
granted under this subsection.
(d) This subsection applies to a member who retires after May 1,
1991, and who is employed at a state educational institution. A member
who had begun but had not completed baccalaureate or
post-baccalaureate education before voluntary or involuntary induction
into military service is entitled to the member's active military service
credit for the member's active military service in an amount equal to
the duration of the member's military service if the following
conditions are met:
(1) The member received a discharge from military service under
conditions other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
honorable conditions.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (g), the member returns to
baccalaureate or post-baccalaureate education not later than
twenty-four (24) months after completion of active military
service and subsequently completes that education.
(3) The member has at least ten (10) years of in-state service
credit.
The time served by a member in active military service for the length
of active service in the hostilities and the necessary demobilization is
not subject to the one-seventh rule set forth in section 7 of this chapter.
However, not more than six (6) years of military service credit may be
granted under this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this section, a member returns to active teaching
service on the earlier of:
(1) the date on which the member signs a teacher's contract; or
(2) the date on which the member is first employed in a position
covered by this article.
(f) For purposes of this section, a member returns to:
(1) a teacher training program; or
(2) baccalaureate or post-baccalaureate education;
on the date the member registers for or enrolls in classes that the
member attends.
(g) The board shall extend the twenty-four (24) month deadline
contained in subsection (b)(2), (c)(2), or (d)(2) if the board determines
that an illness, an injury, or a disability related to the member's military
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


service prevented the member from returning to active teaching service
or to a teacher education program not later than twenty-four (24)
months after the member's discharge from military service. However,
the board may not extend the deadline beyond forty-eight (48) months
after the member's discharge.
(h) If a member retires and the board subsequently determines that
the member is entitled to additional service credit due to the extension
of a deadline under subsection (g), the board shall recompute the
member's benefit. However, the additional service credit may be used
only in the computation of benefits to be paid after the date of the
board's determination, and the member is not entitled to a
recomputation of benefits received before the date of the board's
determination.
(i) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a member is
entitled to military service credit and benefits in the amount and to the
extent required by the federal Uniformed Services Employment and
Reemployment Rights Act (38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq.), including all later
amendments.
(j) Subject to this section, an active member may purchase and
claim not more than two (2) years of service credit for the member's
service on active duty in the armed services if the member meets the
following conditions:
(1) The member has at least one (1) year of credited service in the
fund.
(2) The member serves on active duty in the armed services of the
United States for at least six (6) months.
(3) The member receives a discharge from the armed services
under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). honorable conditions.
(4) Before the member retires, the member makes contributions
to the fund as follows:
(A) Contributions that are equal to the product of:
(i) the member's salary at the time the member actually
makes a contribution for the service credit;
(ii) a rate, determined by the actuary of the fund, that is
based on the age of the member at the time the member
actually makes a contribution for service credit and
computed to result in a contribution amount that
approximates the actuarial present value of the benefit
attributable to the service credit purchased; and
(iii) the number of years of service credit the member
intends to purchase.
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


(B) Contributions for any accrued interest, at a rate determined
by the actuary of the fund, for the period from the member's
initial membership in the fund to the date payment is made by
the member.
However, a member is entitled to purchase service credit under this
subsection only to the extent that service credit is not granted for that
time under another provision of this section. At least ten (10) years of
service in Indiana is required before a member may receive a benefit
based on service credits purchased under this section. A member who
terminates employment before satisfying the eligibility requirements
necessary to receive a monthly allowance or receives a monthly
allowance for the same service from another tax supported public
employee retirement plan other than under the federal Social Security
Act may withdraw the purchase amount plus accumulated interest after
submitting a properly completed application for a refund to the fund.
(k) The following apply to the purchase of service credit under
subsection (j):
(1) The board may allow a member to make periodic payments of
the contributions required for the purchase of the service credit.
The board shall determine the length of the period during which
the payments must be made.
(2) The board may deny an application for the purchase of service
credit if the purchase would exceed the limitations under Section
415 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) A member may not claim the service credit for purposes of
determining eligibility or computing benefits unless the member
has made all payments required for the purchase of the service
credit.
(l) This subsection applies to a member who retires after June 30,
2006. A member may not receive credit under this section for service
for which the member receives service credit under the terms of a
military or another governmental retirement plan.
SECTION 8. IC 9-18.5-7-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) An Indiana resident who is a current or
former member of the Army or Air National Guard may apply for and
receive one (1) or more license plates under this chapter.
(b) An individual applying for a National Guard license plate under
this chapter as a current member of the National Guard must
demonstrate the individual's status as a current member of the Army or
Air National Guard by presenting the following with the individual's
application:
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


(1) A current United States armed forces identification card.
(2) A letter signed by the individual's commanding officer
identifying the individual as a current active member.
(c) An individual applying for a National Guard license plate under
this chapter as a former member of the National Guard must present
with the individual's application a copy of the individual's:
(1) National Guard Bureau Form 22 or 22A showing the
individual received a discharge under conditions other than
conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2); honorable conditions;
or
(2) National Guard Bureau Form 23D or 23E showing the
individual as retired;
as proof of the individual's status as a former member of the Army or
Air National Guard.
SECTION 9. IC 10-16-6-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) A commissioned officer:
(1) who serves in the Indiana national guard for at least five (5)
years; or
(2) who becomes permanently disabled from performing the
officer's duties, irrespective of length of service;
may, upon retirement from the military service under honorable
conditions, other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2),
whether by resignation or otherwise, and upon application to the
adjutant general, be carried upon a roll to be established and
maintained in the office of the adjutant general. The roll shall be
designated the Indiana national guard retired list.
(b) The commissioned officer may wear, on occasion of ceremony,
the uniform of the highest rank held by the officer.
(c) An officer carried on the Indiana national guard retired list, if
qualified, is eligible for detail or appointment on the general staff or the
staff of any commander when not physically disqualified for military
duty. However, if an officer carried on the Indiana national guard
retired list is appointed to a staff position as described in this section,
the officer shall be recommissioned in the rank to which the officer has
been appointed. The officer shall hold this rank during the time of the
staff appointment unless the officer is promoted to a higher rank.
(d) If the officer retires for a second time from active service, the
officer shall be entered on the Indiana national guard retired list with
the officer's highest rank.
(e) An officer whose name appears on the national guard retired list
is not entitled to receive any military pay or emolument from the state
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


during the time the officer remains on the national guard retired list
unless the officer is specifically assigned to duty on orders from the
governor. If the officer is assigned to duty on orders from the governor,
the officer is entitled only to the military pay and allowance provided
by law for officers of the rank to which appointed.
SECTION 10. IC 10-17-1-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) Subject to subsection (h), a county executive
shall employ a service officer and may employ service officer assistants
to serve the veterans of the county. However, with the approval of the
commission, two (2) or more counties may enter into an agreement to
employ a service officer if each county demonstrates to the commission
that the workload does not justify each county employing a separate
county service officer.
(b) Subject to subsection (h), the mayor of a city may employ a
service officer and may employ service officer assistants to serve the
veterans of the city.
(c) The service officer shall:
(1) be:
(A) a veteran who received a discharge from military service
under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2) honorable conditions and who has at least
six (6) months of active service in the armed forces of the
United States; or
(B) a service officer assistant with not less than two (2) years
of experience; and
(2) be a resident of Indiana or become a resident of Indiana not
more than six (6) months after the service officer's start date.
(d) A service officer assistant must be a resident of Indiana or
become a resident of Indiana not later than six (6) months after the
service officer assistant's start date and:
(1) satisfy the requirements specified in subsection (c)(1); or
(2) be the spouse, surviving spouse, parent, or child of a person
who satisfies the requirements specified in subsection (c)(1).
(e) A rule contrary to subsection (c) or (d) is void.
(f) County and city fiscal bodies may appropriate funds necessary
for the purposes described in this section.
(g) Every county or city official and department of the county or city
shall cooperate with the service officer and shall provide the service
officer with information necessary in connection with the performance
of the service officer's duties. Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to require a county or city to share information that is
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


otherwise considered confidential in accordance with law.
(h) After June 30, 2026, a service officer must be accredited by the
department in order to provide service to veterans on behalf of the
county or city.
SECTION 11. IC 10-17-9-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The superintendent may not appoint or employ
a person in an office or a place in the Indiana Veterans' Home because
of the political views or affiliation of the appointee or employee or for
a reason other than capacity and fitness for the duties to be performed
by the appointee or employee. However, among applicants for
appointment found capable and fit, preference shall be given to a
military veteran who received a an honorable discharge from military
service under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2) and the spouse, widow, widower, mother, and child
of a military veteran who received a an honorable discharge from
military service. under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
SECTION 12. IC 10-17-9-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) As used in this section, "eligible person"
refers to either of the following:
(1) A member of the uniformed services who was honorably
discharged from the uniformed services. under conditions other
than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
(2) The spouse or surviving spouse of a member of the uniformed
services who was discharged from the uniformed services under
conditions other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
honorable conditions.
(b) An eligible person who has a disability is eligible for admission
to the home if:
(1) the eligible person is a resident of Indiana or establishes
residency in Indiana not later than six (6) months after admission
to the home; or
(2) in the case of an eligible person referred to in subsection
(a)(1), the eligible person was a resident of Indiana when the
eligible person enlisted in the uniformed services.
(c) The Indiana department of veterans' affairs shall adopt rules
concerning admission to the home.
(d) In adopting rules governing the admission, maintenance, and
discharge of members of the home, the Indiana department of veterans'
affairs may establish a fund called the veterans' home comfort and
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


welfare fund. The director shall deposit all money collected from the
members for the cost of their care and maintenance in the fund. The
director shall expend this money in any manner that adds to the comfort
and welfare of the members of the institutions.
(e) A part of the veterans' home comfort and welfare fund may be
withdrawn and deposited in a special fund called the veterans' home
building fund. The veterans' home building fund shall be used for the
construction, maintenance, remodeling, or repair of buildings of the
home.
(f) Preference under this section may be given to a person who
served in an Indiana military organization. Except in cases where the
surviving spouse of a veteran marries another veteran, the benefits of
this chapter extend only to a surviving spouse and the spouse of a
veteran if the contract of marriage was entered into more than five (5)
years before the date of death of the veteran. Except as otherwise
provided by law, upon the death of a person in the home, money paid
to the person or due to the person from a bank, a trust company, a
corporation, or an individual becomes an asset of the person's estate
and shall be distributed in the manner prescribed by the probate law of
the state.
SECTION 13. IC 10-17-10-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 29, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) In order for an interested person to qualify
for an allowance under this chapter:
(1) the decedent must have been an Indiana resident at the time of
death and must have:
(A) received a discharge from the armed forces of the United
States under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2); honorable conditions; or
(B) died while serving in the armed forces of the United
States; or
(2) the decedent must have been the spouse or surviving spouse
of a person described in subdivision (1)(A) or (1)(B) and must
have been an Indiana resident at the time of death.
(b) An interested person must file a claim for an allowance under
this chapter with the board of commissioners in the county of residence
of the decedent described in subsection (a). The claim must include:
(1) the fact of the service, death, and discharge if discharged from
service before death; and
(2) that the body has been buried in a decent and respectable
manner in a cemetery or burial ground or that the body has been
cremated and the cremains have not been interred.
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


(c) The board of commissioners shall hear and determine the claim
like other claims and, if the facts averred are found to be true, shall
allow the claim in an amount set by ordinance. However, the amount
of the allowance may not be more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
SECTION 14. IC 10-17-13.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "veteran" means an
individual residing in Indiana who:
(1) has served in any branch of the armed forces of the United
States or their reserves, in the national guard, or in the Indiana
National Guard; and
(2) received a discharge from military service under conditions
other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). honorable
conditions.
SECTION 15. IC 16-33-4-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 52, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the
superintendent of the home shall be appointed in the manner prescribed
by law and must meet all of the following conditions:
(1) Be a teacher licensed by the state or have at least a
baccalaureate degree from an accredited college or university in
a field related to education or child growth and development.
(2) Have experience working with children.
(3) At the time of appointment, be a resident and citizen of
Indiana.
(4) Have other qualifications as required by the state health
commissioner.
(b) When at least two (2) candidates meet the conditions listed in
subsection (a), the state health commissioner shall give preference to
individuals who have been discharged from the armed forces of the
United States under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2) honorable conditions in appointing a candidate to
the position of superintendent of the home.
SECTION 16. IC 20-20-7-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 54, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "eligible veteran" refers
to an individual who has the following qualifications:
(1) Served as a member of the armed forces of the United States
at any time during at least one (1) of the following periods:
(A) Beginning April 6, 1917, and ending November 11, 1918
(World War I).
(B) Beginning December 7, 1941, and ending December 31,
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


1946 (World War II).
(C) Beginning June 27, 1950, and ending January 31, 1955
(Korean Conflict).
(D) Beginning August 5, 1964, and ending May 7, 1975
(Vietnam Conflict).
(2) Before the military service described in subdivision (1):
(A) attended a public or nonpublic high school in Indiana; and
(B) was a student in good standing at the high school
described in clause (A), to the satisfaction of the department
of veterans' affairs.
(3) Did not graduate or receive a diploma because of leaving the
high school described in subdivision (2) for the military service
described in subdivision (1).
(4) Was discharged from the armed forces of the United States
under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). honorable conditions.
SECTION 17. IC 20-20-7-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 55, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The department and the department of
veterans' affairs shall jointly design a form for the application for
issuance of a diploma under the program.
(b) The application form must require at least the following
information about an eligible veteran:
(1) Personal identification information.
(2) Military service information, including a copy of the eligible
veteran's discharge from military service under honorable
conditions. other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2).
(3) High school information, including the following:
(A) Name and address, including county, of the last high
school attended.
(B) Whether the high school was a public or nonpublic school.
(C) Years attended.
(D) Year of leaving high school to begin military service.
(E) Year in which the veteran would have graduated if the
veteran had not left high school to begin military service.
(4) If the high school attended was a public school, whether the
veteran prefers receiving a diploma issued by:
(A) the state board; or
(B) the governing body of the school corporation governing
the high school.
SECTION 18. IC 22-4.1-4-3.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 61, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.3. (a) As used in this section, "veteran" means:
(1) a Hoosier veteran (as defined in IC 1-1-4-5(b)); or
(2) an individual who satisfies the following:
(A) The individual is a resident of Indiana.
(B) The individual has previously served on active duty in any
branch of the armed forces of the United States or their
reserves, in the National Guard, or in the Indiana National
Guard.
(C) The individual received a discharge from service under
conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). honorable conditions.
(b) Unless otherwise provided by federal law, the department shall
give a veteran or the spouse of a veteran priority for placement in any
federal or state employment or training program administered by the
department if the veteran or the veteran's spouse:
(1) submits documentation satisfactory to the department
establishing the veteran's honorable discharge from service; and
(2) meets the eligibility requirements for the program.
SECTION 19. IC 25-8-12.1-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 75, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. A person who:
(1) enters active military service of the United States or of this
state:
(A) in time of war or an emergency;
(B) for or during a period of training; or
(C) in connection with or under the operation of a system of
selective service; and
(2) at the time of entry holds a valid license as a registered barber;
shall be granted a similar certificate of registration or license upon
presenting to the board a discharge from military service under
conditions other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2),
honorable conditions, dated not more than six (6) months before the
time of the presentation. The similar certificate or license shall be
granted by the board upon payment of a fee established by the board.
SECTION 20. IC 25-10-1-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 76, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. Any applicant for a license to practice
chiropractic who is a graduate of a legally incorporated chiropractic
school, institution or college, and who can produce satisfactory
evidence to the board that the:
(1) applicant's chiropractic education was interrupted by reason
of the applicant's induction or enlistment into the active armed
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


forces of the United States; and
(2) applicant received a discharge from the armed forces under
conditions other than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2);
honorable conditions;
is entitled to have the applicant's date of graduation determined as if
the applicant had completed the applicant's course of study in
chiropractic without the interruption.
SECTION 21. IC 25-25-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 77, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This section applies to:
(1) any veteran described in IC 10-17-5-2 or IC 10-17-5-1 (before
their repeal); or
(2) any other veteran to whom this chapter applies because of the
provisions of any other statute;
who received a discharge from military service under conditions other
than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2) from such service issued
by the proper authorities. honorable conditions. Such a person shall
be entitled to a license to vend, hawk, and peddle goods, wares, fruits,
and merchandise in any county, city, or town in Indiana without the
payment of any fee for the license. Upon the presentation of the
person's certificate and papers of discharge, properly executed, to the
auditor of any county and proving the person's identity as the person
named in the person's certificate of discharge, the auditor shall issue to
the former soldier or sailor a free license to vend, hawk, and peddle
goods, wares, fruits, and merchandise in the county and in all cities and
towns in the county. A fee may not be charged to the holder of the
license by the auditor, by the authorities of any city or town in the
county, or by any other officer. The license shall be full and complete
authority to vend, hawk, and peddle without the payment of any sum of
money.
(b) A person who acquires a license under this section is subject to
all county, city, or town regulations and ordinances concerning
vendors, hawkers, or peddlers, except for those provisions requiring
payment of money for obtaining a license.
SECTION 22. IC 25-37-1-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 79, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) This section applies to a county having a
consolidated city.
(b) A veteran who received a discharge from the armed forces of the
United States under conditions other than conditions set forth in
IC 10-17-12-7.5(2) honorable conditions is exempt from the payment
of a fee for a transient merchant license issued under this chapter by a
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


municipality located wholly or partially within the county.
(c) Upon the presentation of the veteran's certificate and papers of
discharge and proof of the veteran's identity, the official designated by
the municipality shall issue a transient merchant license to the veteran.
A person licensed under this section shall comply with all ordinances
of the county or municipality governing transient merchants.
SECTION 23. IC 36-8-4-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 92, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) Subject to subsection (c), the board or
persons having the authority to employ members of the fire or police
department shall give a preference for employment according to the
following priority:
(1) A war veteran who has been discharged from the armed forces
of the United States under conditions other than conditions set
forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). honorable conditions.
(2) A person whose mother or father was a:
(A) firefighter of a unit;
(B) municipal police officer; or
(C) county police officer;
who died in the line of duty (as defined in IC 5-10-10-2).
(b) Subject to subsection (c), the board or person having the
authority to employ members of a fire or police department may give
a preference for employment to any of the following:
(1) A police officer or firefighter laid off by another city under
section 11 of this chapter.
(2) A county police officer laid off by a sheriff's department under
IC 36-8-10-11.1.
(3) A person who:
(A) was employed full-time or part-time by a township to
provide fire protection and emergency services; and
(B) has been laid off by the township.
(c) A person described in subsection (a) or (b) may not receive a
preference for employment unless the person:
(1) applies; and
(2) meets all employment requirements prescribed:
(A) by law, including physical and age requirements; and
(B) by the fire or police department.
SECTION 24. IC 36-8-4.7-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 94, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Notwithstanding any contrary law, an
appointing authority shall waive any age restriction for a person not
more than forty (40) years and six (6) months of age that applies to the
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


appointment and hiring of an individual as:
(1) a member of the police department; or
(2) a member of the fire department;
if the individual meets the requirements of subsection (b).
(b) An individual who meets all the following requirements is
entitled to the waiver described in subsection (a):
(1) On the date the individual applies to be appointed and hired
as:
(A) a member of the police department; or
(B) a member of the fire department;
the individual is a veteran who has completed at least twenty (20)
years of military service.
(2) The individual received or is eligible to receive a discharge
from the armed forces of the United States under conditions other
than conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). honorable
conditions.
(3) The individual meets all other requirements for appointment
and hiring as:
(A) a member of the police department; or
(B) a member of the fire department;
including all physical requirements.
(c) An individual who is entitled to the waiver described in
subsection (a) is eligible to become a member of the 1977 fund.
SECTION 25. IC 36-8-5-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 95, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) A police officer or firefighter desiring to
return to service in the police or fire department shall report to the
person responsible for regulating and employing members of the
department. This action must be taken within sixty (60) days after a
discharge under honorable conditions other than conditions set forth
in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2) from military service or government war work.
(b) Within fifteen (15) days after the police officer or firefighter
reports to the department, the police officer or firefighter shall be
placed on duty at the rank held at the time of entering military service
or government war work.
(c) If a member of the police or fire department is refused a proper
assignment under subsection (b), the member of the police or fire
department may file an action in the circuit court, superior court, or
probate court of the county in the manner prescribed by IC 36-8-3-4.
SECTION 26. IC 36-8-10-10.4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 96, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.4. (a) Subject to subsection (c), the board shall
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


give a preference for employment according to the following priority:
(1) A war veteran who has been discharged from the armed forces
of the United States under conditions other than conditions set
forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). honorable conditions.
(2) A person whose mother or father was a:
(A) firefighter of a unit;
(B) municipal police officer; or
(C) county police officer;
who died in the line of duty (as defined in IC 5-10-10-2).
(b) Subject to subsection (c), the board may give a preference for
employment to any of the following:
(1) A member of another department laid off under section 11.1
of this chapter.
(2) A police officer laid off by a city under IC 36-8-4-11.
(c) A person described in subsection (a) or (b) may not receive a
preference for employment unless the person:
(1) applies; and
(2) meets all employment requirements prescribed:
(A) by law, including physical and age requirements; and
(B) by the department.
SECTION 27. IC 36-8-13-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 102, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The executive of a township,
with the approval of the legislative body, may do the following:
(1) Purchase firefighting and emergency services apparatus and
equipment for the township, provide for the housing, care,
maintenance, operation, and use of the apparatus and equipment
to provide services within the township but outside the corporate
boundaries of municipalities, and employ full-time or part-time
personnel to operate the apparatus and equipment and to provide
services in that area. Preference in employment under this section
shall be given according to the following priority:
(A) A war veteran who has been discharged from the armed
forces of the United States under conditions other than
conditions set forth in IC 10-17-12-7.5(2). honorable
conditions.
(B) A person whose mother or father was a:
(i) firefighter of a unit;
(ii) municipal police officer; or
(iii) county police officer;
who died in the line of duty (as defined in IC 5-10-10-2).
The executive of a township may give a preference for
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


employment under this section to a person who was employed
full-time or part-time by another township to provide fire
protection and emergency services and has been laid off by the
township. The executive of a township may also give a preference
for employment to a firefighter laid off by a city under
IC 36-8-4-11. A person described in this subdivision may not
receive a preference for employment unless the person applies for
employment and meets all employment requirements prescribed
by law, including physical and age requirements, and all
employment requirements prescribed by the fire department.
(2) Contract with a municipality in the township or in a
contiguous township that maintains adequate firefighting or
emergency services apparatus and equipment to provide fire
protection or emergency services for the township in accordance
with IC 36-1-7.
(3) Cooperate with a municipality in the township or in a
contiguous township in the purchase, maintenance, and upkeep of
firefighting or emergency services apparatus and equipment for
use in the municipality and township in accordance with
IC 36-1-7.
(4) Contract with a volunteer fire department that has been
organized to fight fires in the township for the use and operation
of firefighting apparatus and equipment that has been purchased
by the township in order to save the private and public property
of the township from destruction by fire, including use of the
apparatus and equipment in an adjoining township by the
department if the department has made a contract with the
executive of the adjoining township for the furnishing of
firefighting service within the township.
(5) Contract with a volunteer fire department that maintains
adequate firefighting service in accordance with IC 36-8-12.
(6) Use money in the township's rainy day fund to pay costs
attributable to providing fire protection or emergency services
under this chapter.
(b) This subsection applies only to townships that provide fire
protection or emergency services or both under subsection (a)(1) and
to municipalities that have some part of the municipal territory within
a township and do not have a full-time paid fire department. A
township may provide fire protection or emergency services or both
without contracts inside the corporate boundaries of the municipalities
if before July 1 of a year the following occur:
(1) The legislative body of the municipality adopts an ordinance
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116


to have the township provide the services without a contract.
(2) The township legislative body passes a resolution approving
the township's provision of the services without contracts to the
municipality.
In a township providing services to a municipality under this section,
the legislative body of either the township or a municipality in the
township may opt out of participation under this subsection by adopting
an ordinance or a resolution, respectively, before July 1 of a year.
(c) This subsection applies only to a township that:
(1) is located in a county containing a consolidated city;
(2) has at least three (3) included towns (as defined in
IC 36-3-1-7) that have all municipal territory completely within
the township on January 1, 1996; and
(3) provides fire protection or emergency services, or both, under
subsection (a)(1);
and to included towns (as defined in IC 36-3-1-7) that have all the
included town's municipal territory completely within the township. A
township may provide fire protection or emergency services, or both,
without contracts inside the corporate boundaries of the municipalities
if before August 1 of the year preceding the first calendar year to which
this subsection applies the township legislative body passes a
resolution approving the township's provision of the services without
contracts to the municipality. The resolution must identify the included
towns to which the resolution applies. In a township providing services
to a municipality under this section, the legislative body of the
township may opt out of participation under this subsection by adopting
a resolution before July 1 of a year. A copy of a resolution adopted
under this subsection shall be submitted to the executive of each
included town covered by the resolution, the county auditor, and the
department of local government finance.
2026 IN 166—LS 6715/DI 116